Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.020

Charter schools—Parameters.

A charter school established under this chapter:

(1) Is a public school that is:

(a) Open to all children free of charge and by choice; and

(b) Operated separately from the common school system as an alternative to traditional common schools;

(2) May offer any program or course of study that any other public school may offer, including one or more of grades kindergarten through twelve;

(3) Is governed by a charter school board according to the terms of a renewable, five-year charter contract executed under RCW 28A.710.160;

(4) Functions as a local education agency under applicable federal laws and regulations and is responsible for meeting the requirements of local education agencies and public schools under those federal laws and regulations, including but not limited to compliance with the individuals with disabilities education improvement act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1401 et seq.), the federal educational rights and privacy act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g), the McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act of 1987 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11431 et seq.), and the elementary and secondary education act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.).

[ 2016 c 241 s 102. Prior: 2013 c 2 s 202 (Initiative Measure No. 1240, approved November 6, 2012).]